Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB741.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2330. Harvesting of certain antlered deer by senior license holders.(a) Authorization.--A senior license holder may harvest an antlered deer with two or more points on one antler or a spike three or more inches in length.(b) Definition.--As used in this subsec tion, t he term "point" shall have the meaning given the term in 58 Pa. Code § 131.2 (relating to definitions).Section 2. Any regulation or rule which conflicts with the addition of 34 Pa.C.S. § 2330 is abrogated.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.123456789101112131415161718